South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3916.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 53, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-53-150. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, ivermectin tablets and hydroxychloroquine tablets may be made available to the public for over-the-counter purchase in this State. No prescription order or consultation with a pharmacist or other healthcare professional shall be required for such purchase. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----